Tennessee, session 114, SB1067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1007(c), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subsection:
Each LEA shall publish the character education curriculum on the LEA's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1067
003232
- 1 -